Hawaii statutes.
[§379A-2] Penalty. Any person
violating section 379A-1 shall be fined not more than $200 or imprisoned not
more than six months, or both. [L Sp 1949, c 8, §3; RL 1955, §300-3; HRS
§757-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next